New Jersey, session 222, A4112.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Commencing on the first day of the seventh month following the effective date of P.L.   , c. (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a sign language interpreter shall provide simultaneous interpretation of the proceedings of each session of the Senate and each session of the General Assembly. Commencing on the first day of the 25th month following the effective date of P.L.   , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a sign language interpreter shall provide simultaneous interpretation of the proceedings of each committee meeting and hearing of a standing reference committee of the Senate and of the General Assembly. This section shall apply when the session, meeting, or hearing is conducted in person or remotely by video. The Department of Human Services shall provide, in coordination with the Office of Legislative Services, the sign language interpreters for the sessions and committee meetings and hearings of the Legislature. As used in this section, sign language means a visual-gestural language that incorporates facial grammatical markers, physical affect markers, spatial linguistic information, and fingerspelling, as well as signs made with the hands. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.